Maryland, session 2026, SB0370.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
1A–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Acupuncture” means a form of health care based on East Asian medical
theories of energetic physiology that describe the interrelationship of the body organs and
functions.
(c) “Auricular detoxification” means an acupuncture technique involving the
needling of the external auricle of the human ear for the purpose of assisting a person who
is undergoing detoxification to remove addictive substances from the body and restoring
health.
(d) “Board” means the State Acupuncture Board.
– 1 –

Ch. 234 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(e) “License” means, unless the context requires otherwise, a license issued by the
Board to practice acupuncture.
(F) (1) “MANUAL THERAPIES” MEANS TREATMENT MODALITIES THAT
APPLY PRESSURE OR MANIPULATION USING HANDS OR ANOTHER PART OF THE
BODY ALONG POINTS OR MERIDIANS THAT NORMALIZE ELECTROMAGNETIC OR
ENERGETIC FUNCTION.
(2) “MANUAL THERAPIES” INCLUDE ACUPRESSURE OR OTHER
PRESSURE TREATMENT TECHNIQUES BASED ON EAST ASIAN MEDICAL THERAPIES.
[(f)] (G) (1) “Practice acupuncture” means the use of East Asian medical
therapies for the purpose of normalizing energetic physiological functions including pain
control, and for the promotion, maintenance, and restoration of health.
(2) “Practice acupuncture” includes:
(i) Stimulation of the body by the insertion of needles;
(ii) The application of moxibustion; and
(iii) Manual THERAPIES, mechanical THERAPIES, thermal
THERAPIES, electrical THERAPIES, or other East Asian medical therapies only when
performed in accordance with the principles of East Asian medical theories and practices.
[(g)] (H) “Supervision” means:
(1) A formalized professional relationship between a licensed
acupuncturist and an individual performing auricular detoxification that provides
evaluation and direction of the individual to adequately ensure the safety and welfare of
clients during the course of treatment; and
(2) As defined by the Board in regulations:
(i) Periodic direct supervision where the licensed acupuncturist is
present or on–site during treatment; and
(ii) General supervision where the licensed acupuncturist is neither
present nor on–site during treatment.
1A–302.
(b) The applicant shall:
(1) Be of good moral character;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 234
(2) Be at least 18 years old;
(3) Demonstrate competence in performing acupuncture by meeting the
following standards for education or training:
(i) If the applicant is issued a license on or before May 31, 2026:
1. Graduation from at least a master’s level program or its
equivalent in acupuncture that is:
A. Approved by the Maryland Higher Education
Commission;
B. Accredited by the Accreditation Commission for
Acupuncture and [Oriental] HERBAL Medicine; or
C. Found by the Board to be equivalent to a course approved
or accredited under item A or B of this item; or
2. Achievement of a:
A. Diplomate in acupuncture from the National Certification
Commission for Acupuncture and Oriental Medicine; or
B. Passing score on an examination that is determined by the
Board to be equivalent to the examination given by the National Certification Commission
for Acupuncture and Oriental Medicine; or
(ii) If the applicant is issued a license on or after June 1, 2026:
1. Graduation from at least a master’s level program or its
equivalent in acupuncture that is:
A. Approved by the Maryland Higher Education
Commission;
B. Accredited by the Accreditation Commission for
Acupuncture and [Oriental] HERBAL Medicine; or
C. Found by the Board to be equivalent to a course approved
or accredited under item A or B of this item; and
2. Achievement of a passing score on an examination given
by the National Certification Commission for Acupuncture and Oriental Medicine or
– 3 –

Ch. 234 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
determined by the Board to be equivalent to the examination given by the National
Certification Commission for Acupuncture and Oriental Medicine;
(4) Demonstrate the ability to communicate in the English language; and
(5) Meet any other qualifications that the Board establishes in regulations.
1A–306.
(e) The Board shall renew the license of and [issue a renewal certificate] MAKE
AVAILABLE PROOF OF RENEWAL to each licensee who meets the requirements of this
section.
1A–403.
EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS TITLE, A PERSON MAY NOT:
(1) EMPLOY AN INDIVIDUAL TO PRACTICE ACUPUNCTURE WITHOUT A
LICENSE; OR
(2) AID OR ABET THE UNAUTHORIZED PRACTICE OF ACUPUNCTURE
IN VIOLATION OF § 1A–401 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
[1A–403.] 1A–404.
(a) A person who violates [any provision] § 1A–401 OR § 1A–402 of this subtitle
is [guilty]:
(1) GUILTY of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to a fine not
exceeding $5,000 or imprisonment not exceeding 3 years or both[.
(b) A person who violates § 1A–401 or § 1A–402 of this subtitle is subject]; AND
(2) SUBJECT to a civil fine not to exceed $50,000 to be assessed by the
Board in accordance with regulations adopted by the Board.
(B) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES § 1A–403 OF THIS SUBTITLE IS:
(1) (I) FOR A FIRST OFFENSE, GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON
CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR IMPRISONMENT NOT
EXCEEDING 1 YEAR OR BOTH; AND
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 234
(II) FOR A SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE, GUILTY OF A FELONY AND ON
CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 PER DAY OR
IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 5 YEARS OR BOTH; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO A CIVIL FINE NOT TO EXCEED $10,000 TO BE
ASSESSED BY THE BOARD IN ACCORDANCE WITH REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE
BOARD.
(C) THE BOARD SHALL REMIT ANY PENALTY COLLECTED UNDER THIS
SECTION INTO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 5 –